Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 316.796
to 316.803.
SECTION 2. (1) For each tax year in which a taxpayer claims a subtraction or exemption
under ORS 316.798, the taxpayer shall  maintain the records described in subsection (2) of this
section, and any other  records as required by the Department of Revenue under ORS 316.796
to 316.803.
(2) A taxpayer shall maintain, and shall furnish to the department upon the request  of
the department, the following:
(a) Account statements that show the contributions made  during the tax year and the
taxable interest  or earnings on the account in the tax year for which the subtraction or ex-
emption is claimed;
(b) The information return issued by the financial institution  for the account for the tax
year for which the subtraction or exemption is claimed; and
(c) Upon a withdrawal of funds from a first-time home  buyer savings account, a copy of
the real estate settlement statement  demonstrating that the withdrawal was used for eligible
costs.
SECTION 3. (1) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to administer ORS 316.796
to 316.803. Rules adopted  under this section may not impose administrative, reporting or
other obligations or requirements  on financial institutions related to first-time home buyer
savings accounts.
(2) The department  may prepare and distribute informational materials regarding the
first-time home buyer savings account  to financial institutions and potential home buyers
to publicize the availability of first-time home buyer savings accounts.
SECTION 4.  ORS 316.796 is amended to read:
316.796. As used in ORS 316.796 to 316.803:
(1) “Account holder” means  [ a first-time home buyer ] an individual who establishes a first-time
home buyer savings account.
(2) “Allowable closing costs” means disbursements listed  in a settlement statement for the pur-
chase of a single family residence by an account holder  or a qualified beneficiary .
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 1
(3) “Eligible costs” means the  down payment and allowable closing costs for the purchase of a
single family residence by an account holder  or a qualified beneficiary .
(4) “Financial institution” means a bank, a trust company, a commercial bank, a national bank,
a savings bank, a savings  and loan, a thrift institution, a credit union, an insurance company, a
mutual fund, an investment firm or a similar entity authorized to do business in this state.
(5) “First-time home buyer” means an individual  who is a resident of this state and has not
owned or purchased, either individually or jointly, a single family residence during a period  of three
years prior to the date of the purchase of a single family residence.
(6) “First-time home buyer savings account” or “account” means an account established  as a
first-time home buyer savings account [ by written agreement  between an account holder and a finan-
cial institution and ] that  the account holder designates for the purpose of paying or reimbursing el-
igible costs for the purchase of a single  family residence in this state by the account holder  or by
a qualified beneficiary.
(7) “Qualified beneficiary” means an individual who is designated by  an account holder
as the account holder’s  intended recipient of funds to be withdrawn from a first-time home
buyer savings account and used for purposes consistent with ORS 316.796 to 316.803.
[(7)] (8) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
[(8)] (9) “Settlement statement” means the statement of  receipts and disbursements for a trans-
action  related  to real estate, including a statement prescribed under the Real Estate Settlement
Procedures Act of 1974, 12 U.S.C. 2601 et seq., and regulations thereunder.
[(9)] (10) “Single family residence” means a residence intended for occupation by a single family
unit that is  owned and occupied [ by an account holder as the account holder’s ] as the  principal res-
idence of the account holder or a qualified beneficiary . “Single family residence” includes a
manufactured home, residential trailer, mobile home or condominium unit.
[(10)] (11) “Taxable income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.022.
SECTION 5.  ORS 316.797 is amended to read:
316.797. (1) An individual may create  a first-time home buyer savings account with a financial
institution to be  used to pay or reimburse [ the account holder’s ] eligible costs related to the purchase
of a single family residence [ by entering into a first-time home  buyer savings account agreement with
the financial institution ] by an account holder or qualified beneficiary .
(2) An individual may jointly  own a first-time home buyer savings account with another person
if the joint account holders [ are both first-time home buyers and ] file a joint income tax return.
[(3) An individual may not be the account holder of more than one first-time home buyer savings
account.]
(3) During any calendar year, an individual may be either:
(a) The account holder of not more than one first-time home buyer savings account; or
(b) The qualified beneficiary of not more than one first-time home buyer savings account.
(4) Only cash may be  contributed to a first-time home buyer savings account. Subject to the
limitations of ORS 316.798 (4), persons other  than the account holder may contribute funds to a
first-time home buyer savings account. There is no limitation on the amount of contributions  that
may be made to or retained in a first-time home buyer savings account.
(5) The account holder may not use funds held  in a first-time home buyer savings account to pay
expenses of administering the account, except that the financial institution that administers the ac-
count may deduct a service fee from the account.
(6) An account holder may withdraw all or part of the funds from a first-time  home buyer
savings account and deposit the funds in a new first-time home buyer savings account held by  a
different financial institution or the same financial institution.
[(7) No financial institution is required to offer first-time  home buyer savings accounts to customers
of the institution. ]
SECTION 6.
 ORS 316.803 is amended to read:
316.803. (1) On or before January 31 of each calendar year,  for calendar years beginning be-
fore January 1, 2025,  a financial institution at  which an account holder has created a first-time
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 2
home buyer savings account shall provide to the account  holder a certificate containing the fol-
lowing information:
(a) The date when the account was created;
(b) The name of the account holder;
(c) The amount of funds contributed to the account during the tax year;
(d) The amount of funds withdrawn from the account during the tax year; and
(e) Any other information as required by rules adopted by the Department of Revenue.
(2) A financial institution is not required to:
(a) Track the use of moneys withdrawn from a first-time home buyer savings account; [ or]
(b) Allocate  funds in a first-time home buyer savings account among joint account holders[ .];
or
(c) Designate an account as a first-time home buyer savings account, including  in the
account contracts or systems of the financial institution.
(3) An account holder or a joint account holder  may designate an account at a financial
institution as a first-time home buyer savings  account and may designate a proposed first-
time home buyer as the qualified beneficiary of the  account. The designations required under
this subsection shall be made to the Department of Revenue, in a form  and manner pre-
scribed by the department. The department may provide a means  by which the designations
required under this subsection are indicated on an income  tax return filed by the account
holder.
[(3)] (4) A financial institution is not responsible or liable for:
(a) Determining or ensuring that an account satisfies the requirements to be  a first-time home
buyer savings account;
(b) Determining or ensuring that funds in a  first-time home buyer savings account are used for
eligible costs; or
(c) Reporting or remitting taxes or  penalties related to the use of a first-time home buyer
savings account.
[(4)] (5) Upon being furnished  proof of the death of the account holder and such other informa-
tion required by the contract governing the first-time home buyer savings account, a financial  in-
stitution shall distribute the  principal and accumulated interest or other income in the first-time
home buyer savings account in accordance with the terms of the contract governing the account.
SECTION 7.
Sections 2 and 3  of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 316.796, 316.797
and 316.803 by sections 4 to 6 of this 2024 Act apply to  first-time home buyer savings ac-
counts created on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate February 20, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 4